es: Tamaño de rosca para dardos: 1/4 de pulgada; 1/4 de pulgada UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Sin rosca (a presión); N.º 5; N.º 6; Otro
th: ขนาดเกลียวของลูกดอก: 1/4 นิ้ว; 1/4 นิ้ว UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; ไม่มีเกลียว (กดเข้า); No. 5; No. 6; อื่นๆ
ko: 다트 나사 크기: 1/4인치; 1/4인치 UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; 나사산 없음(푸시인); No. 5; No. 6; 기타
pl: Rozmiar gwintu strzałki: 1/4 cala; 1/4 cala UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Bez gwintu (wciskany); Nr 5; Nr 6; Inne
sl-SI: Velikost navoja pikada: 1/4 palca; 1/4 palca UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Brez navoja (potisno); No. 5; No. 6; Drugo
hr-HR: Veličina konca strelice: 1/4 inča; 1/4 inča UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Bez navoja (utično); Br. 5; Br. 6; Ostalo
de: Dart-Gewindegröße: 1/4 Zoll; 1/4 Zoll UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Kein Gewinde (Stecksystem); Nr. 5; Nr. 6; Sonstige
vi: Kích thước ren của phi tiêu: 1/4 inch; 1/4 inch UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Không có ren (đẩy vào); Số 5; Số 6; Khác
da: Darttrådstørrelse: 1/4 tomme; 1/4 tomme UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Uden gevind (push-in); Nr. 5; Nr. 6; Andet
zh-TW: 飛鏢螺紋尺寸: 1/4 吋; 1/4 吋 UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; 無螺紋 (推入式); 5 號; 6 號; 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu šípky: 1/4 palca; 1/4 palca UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Bez závitu (zásuvný); Č. 5; Č. 6; Iné
zh-CN: 飞镖螺纹尺寸: 1/4 英寸; 1/4 英寸 UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; 无螺纹（插入式）; 5 号; 6 号; 其他
en: Dart thread size: 1/4 inch; 1/4 inch UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; No thread (push-in); No. 5; No. 6; Other
nl: Schroefdraadmaat dartpijl: 1/4 inch; 1/4 inch UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Geen schroefdraad (push-in); Nr. 5; Nr. 6; Overige
sv: Storlek på piltråd: 1/4 tum; 1/4 tum UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Utan gänga (intryckbar); Nr 5; Nr 6; Övrigt
ru: Размер резьбы дротика: 1/4 дюйма; 1/4 дюйма UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Без резьбы (вставной); No. 5; No. 6; Другое
fr: Calibre de fléchette: 1/4 po; 1/4 po UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Sans filetage (à insérer); Nº 5; Nº 6; Autre
pt-BR: Tamanho da rosca do dardo: 1/4 de polegada; UNC de 1/4 de polegada; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Sem rosca (encaixe); Nº 5; Nº 6; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на стреличките: 1/4 инча; 1/4 инча UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Без резба (с натискане); № 5; № 6; Други
hu: Dart menetméret: 1/4 inch; 1/4 inch UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Menet nélküli (benyomós); No. 5; No. 6; Egyéb
ja: ダーツスレッドサイズ: 1/4インチ; 1/4インチ UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; ネジなし (プッシュイン); No. 5; No. 6; その他
lt-LT: Dartų sriegio dydis: 1/4 col.; 1/4 col. UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Be sriegio (įspaudžiamas); Nr. 5; Nr. 6; Kita
cs: Velikost závitu šipky: 1/4 palce; 1/4 palce UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Bez závitu (zasunovací); Č. 5; Č. 6; Jiné
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος βέλους: 1/4 ίντσας; 1/4 ίντσας UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Χωρίς σπείρωμα (κουμπωτό); No. 5; No. 6; Άλλο
tr: Dart vidası ölçüsü: 1/4 inç; 1/4 inç UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Dişsiz (itmeli); No. 5; No. 6; Diğer
pt-PT: Tamanho da rosca do dardo: 1/4 de polegada; 1/4 polegadas UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Sem rosca (de encaixe); N.º 5; N.º 6; Outro
fi: Tikan kierrekoko: 1/4 tuumaa; 1/4 tuumaa UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Ei kierrettä (työnnettävä); No. 5; No. 6; Muu
nb: Gjengestørrelse for pil: 1/4 tomme; 1/4 tomme UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Uten gjenger (trykk-inn); Nr. 5; Nr. 6; Annet
ro-RO: Dimensiunea filetului de darts: 1/4 inchi; 1/4 inchi UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Fără filet (prin apăsare); Nr. 5; Nr. 6; Altele
it: Taglia del thread del dardo: 1/4 di pollice; 1/4 di pollice UNC; 2BA; 3BA; 4BA; 5BA; M3; Senza filettatura (a pressione); N. 5; N. 6; Altro